Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.410

Nuisances.

Every act or thing done or being within the limits of a town, which is declared by law or by ordinance to be a nuisance shall be a nuisance and shall be so considered in all actions and proceedings. All remedies given by law for the prevention and abatement of nuisances shall apply thereto.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.410. Prior: 1890 p 205 s 160; RRS s 9181.]

NOTES:

Nuisances: Chapter 9.66 RCW.